Mississippi statutes. Title 81. Banks and Financial Institutions
Subarticle B. Companies Authorized to Act as a Fiduciary.

§ 81-27-1.101.
Companies authorized to act as a fiduciary.

No company shall act as a fiduciary in this state except:

A state trust company;

A state bank;

A savings association organized under the laws of this state and authorized to act as a fiduciary pursuant to Section 81-12-1 et seq. or Section 81-14-1 et seq.;

A national bank having its principal office in this state and authorized by the Comptroller of the Currency to act as a fiduciary pursuant to 12 USCS 92a;

A federally chartered savings association having its principal office in this state and authorized by its federal chartering authority to act as a fiduciary;

An out-of-state bank with a branch in this state established or maintained pursuant to Section 81-23-1 et seq. or a trust office licensed by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter;

An out-of-state trust company with a trust office licensed by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter; or

A foreign bank with a trust office licensed by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter.

No company shall engage in an unauthorized trust activity.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-1.102.
Activities not requiring a charter, etc.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a company does not engage in the trust business or in any other business in a manner requiring a charter, license or registration under this chapter or in an unauthorized trust activity by:

Acting in a manner authorized by law and in the scope of authority as an agent of a trust institution with respect to an activity which is not an unauthorized trust activity;

Rendering a service customarily performed as an attorney or law firm in a manner approved and authorized by the Supreme Court of this state;

Acting as trustee under a deed of trust delivered only as security for the payment of money or for the performance of another act;

Receiving and distributing rents and proceeds of sale as a licensed real estate broker on behalf of a principal in a manner authorized by the Mississippi Real Estate Commission;

Engaging in a securities transaction or providing an investment advisory service as a licensed and registered broker-dealer, investment advisor or registered representative thereof, provided the activity is regulated by the Secretary of State or the Securities and Exchange Commission;

Rendering service as a financial advisor or financial planner, provided that the person rendering that service has successfully completed the education and training requirements prescribed by a national certifying organization, has received certification from that organization, and holds current certification from that organization;

Engaging in the sale and administration of an insurance product by an insurance company or agent licensed by the Department of Insurance to the extent that the activity is regulated by the Department of Insurance;

Engaging in the lawful sale of prepaid funeral benefits under a permit issued by the Insurance Commissioner under Section 83-37-1 et seq. or engaging in the lawful business of a perpetual care cemetery corporation under Sections 41-43-35 through 41-43-53;

Acting as trustee under a voting trust as provided by Section 91-9-1 et seq.;

Acting as trustee by a public, private, or independent institution of higher education or a university system, including its affiliated foundations or corporations, with respect to endowment funds or other funds owned, controlled, provided to or otherwise made available to such institution with respect to its educational or research purposes;

Engaging in other activities expressly excluded from the application of this chapter by rule of the department;

Rendering services customarily performed by a certified public accountant in a manner authorized by the State Board of Public Accountancy;

Provided the company is a trust institution and is not barred by order of the commissioner from engaging in a trust business in this state pursuant to Section 81-27-2.302(b), (1) marketing or soliciting in this state through the mails, telephone, any electronic means or in person with respect to acting or proposing to act as a fiduciary outside of this state, (2) delivering money or other intangible assets and receiving the same from a client or other person in this state, or (3) accepting or executing outside of this state a trust of any client or otherwise acting as a fiduciary outside of this state for any client;

Acting as trustee by a religious denomination, church or synagogue, including affiliated foundations or corporations, with respect to endowment funds or other funds owned, controlled, provided to or otherwise made available to such religious denomination, church or synagogue with respect to its religious or charitable purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 557, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 12, 2010.).

§ 81-27-1.103.
Trust business of state trust institution.

A state trust institution may act as a fiduciary or otherwise engage in a trust business in this or any other state or foreign country, subject to complying with applicable laws of such state or foreign country, at an office established and maintained pursuant to this chapter, at a branch or at any location other than an office or branch.

In addition, a state trust institution may conduct any activities at any office outside this state that are permissible for a trust institution chartered by the host state where the office is located, except to the extent such activities are expressly prohibited by the laws of this state or by any regulation or order of the commissioner applicable to the state trust institution; however, the commissioner may waive any such prohibition if he or she determines, by order or regulation, that the involvement of out-of-state offices of state trust institutions in particular activities would not threaten the safety or soundness of such state trust institutions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-1.104.
Trust business of out-of-state trust institution.

An out-of-state trust institution which establishes or maintains one or more offices in this state under this chapter may conduct any activity at each such office which would be authorized under the laws of this state for a state trust institution to conduct at such an office.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 81-27-1.105.
Name of trust institution.

A state trust company or out-of-state trust institution may register any name with the commissioner in connection with establishing a principal office, trust office or representative trust office in this state pursuant to this chapter, except that the commissioner may determine that a name proposed to be registered is potentially misleading to the public and require the registrant to select a name which is not potentially misleading.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 437, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.